Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.160

Inspection, certification prior to using "CA" or similar designation—Eradication required, when.

No person in this state shall place or stamp the letters "CA" or a similar designation in conjunction with a number or numbers upon any container or subcontainer of any fruits or vegetables, unless the director has inspected such fruits or vegetables and issued a state lot number for such fruits or vegetables in conjunction with a certificate stating their quality and condition, that they were stored in a warehouse licensed under the provisions of this chapter and that they meet all other requirements of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder: PROVIDED, That if such fruits or vegetables are not allowed to enter the channels of commerce within two weeks of such inspection or a subsequent similar inspection by the director the letters "CA" and the state lot number shall be eradicated by the licensee.

[ 1961 c 29 s 16.]